basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SET UTF-8
TRY aáeéěiíoóuúůyýbcčdďlmnňfjkprřsštťvghqwxzžAÁEÉĚIÍOÓUÚŮYÝBCČDĎLMNŇFJKPRŘSŠTŤVGHQWXZŽ

PFX N1 Y 1
PFX N1   0           ne         .   sticky

PFX N2 Y 1
PFX N2   0           ne/W2         .  sticky

PFX E1 Y 1
PFX E1   0           nej        .

PFX W1 Y 3
PFX W1   0           ne         .   sticky
PFX W1   0           nej        .
PFX W1   0           nejne      .

PFX W2 Y 1
PFX W2   0           nej        .

PFX F1 Y 11
PFX F1   0           jedna      .
PFX F1   0           jedena      .
PFX F1   0           dvaa       .
PFX F1   0           třia       .
PFX F1   0           čtyřia     .
PFX F1   0           čtyrya     .
PFX F1   0           pěta       .
PFX F1   0           šesta      .
PFX F1   0           sedma      .
PFX F1   0           osma       .
PFX F1   0           devěta     .


PFX F2 Y 27
PFX F2  0           jedno/F5      .  sticky  
PFX F2  0           dvou/F5       .  sticky
PFX F2  0           tří/F5        .  sticky
PFX F2  0           čtyř/F5       .  sticky
PFX F2  0           pěti/F5       .  sticky
PFX F2  0           šesti/F5      .  sticky
PFX F2  0           sedmi/F5      .  sticky
PFX F2  0           osmi/F5       .  sticky
PFX F2  0           devíti/F5     .  sticky
PFX F2  0           deseti/F5     .  sticky
PFX F2  0           jedenácti/F5  .  sticky
PFX F2  0           dvanácti/F5   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           třinácti/F5   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           čtrnácti/F5   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           patnácti/F5   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           šestnácti/F5   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           sedmnácti/F5   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           osmnácti/F5   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           devatenácti/F5   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           dvaceti/F1F6   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           třiceti/F1F6   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           čtyřiceti/F1F6   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           padesáti/F1F6   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           šedesáti/F1F6   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           sedmdesáti/F1F6   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           osmdesáti/F1F6   .  sticky
PFX F2  0           devadesáti/F1F6   .  sticky

PFX F3  Y 8
PFX F3  0           dvou       .  sticky
PFX F3  0           tří        .  sticky
PFX F3  0           čtyř       .  sticky
PFX F3  0           pěti       .  sticky
PFX F3  0           šesti      .  sticky
PFX F3  0           sedmi      .  sticky
PFX F3  0           osmi       .  sticky
PFX F3  0           devíti     .  sticky

PFX F5  Y 2
PFX F5  0           sto   .  sticky
PFX F5  0           set/F3   .  sticky,invalid


PFX F6 Y 11
PFX F6   0           jedna/F5      .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           jedena/F5     .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           dvaa/F5       .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           třia/F5       .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           čtyřia/F5     .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           čtyrya/F5     .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           pěta/F5       .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           šesta/F5      .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           sedma/F5      .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           osma/F5       .  sticky,invalid
PFX F6   0           devěta/F5     .  sticky,invalid



SFX Y2 Y 9
SFX Y2   ý           ější/W2N2Y1         [bdmnptv]ý
SFX Y2   ý           ejší/W2N2Y1         lý
SFX Y2   rý          řejší/W2N2Y1        rý
SFX Y2   í           ější/W2N2Y1         ní
SFX Y2   cký         čtější/W2N2Y1       cký
SFX Y2   ský         štější/W2N2Y1       ský
SFX Y2   ý           ejší/W2N2Y1         [sz]ý
SFX Y2   hý          žejší/W2N2Y1        [^c]hý
SFX Y2   chý         šejší/W2N2Y1        chý

SFX Y3 Y 5
SFX Y3   ý           ší/W2N2Y1           [bdmnprstvz]ý
SFX Y3   hý          žší/W2N2Y1          [^c]hý
SFX Y3   chý         šší/W2N2Y1          chý
SFX Y3   ký          ší/W2N2Y1           ký
SFX Y3   ý           ší/W2N2Y1           [sz]ý

SFX Y4 Y 2
SFX Y4   ý           čí/W2N2Y1          [nvtdbpm]ý
SFX Y4   ký          čí/W2N2Y1          ký

SFX Y5 Y 8
SFX Y5   krátký      kratší/W2N1Y1      krátký
SFX Y5   nízký       nižší/W2N1Y1       nízký
SFX Y5   velký       větší/W2N1Y1       velký
SFX Y5   dlouhý      delší/W2N1Y1       dlouhý
SFX Y5   malý        menší/W2N1Y1       malý
SFX Y5   dobrý       lepší/W2N1Y1       dobrý
SFX Y5   zlý         horší/W2Y1         zlý     
SFX Y5   špatný      horší/W2Y1         špatný     



SFX Y6 Y 9
SFX Y6   ý           ější/W2Y1         [bdmnptv]ý
SFX Y6   ý           ejší/W2Y1         lý
SFX Y6   rý          řejší/W2Y1        rý
SFX Y6   í           ější/W2Y1         ní
SFX Y6   cký         čtější/W2Y1       cký
SFX Y6   ský         štější/W2Y1       ský
SFX Y6   ý           ejší/W2Y1         [sz]ý
SFX Y6   hý          žejší/W2Y1        [^c]hý
SFX Y6   chý         šejší/W2Y1        chý



SFX Y7 Y 5
SFX Y7   ý           ší/W2Y1           [bdmnprstvz]ý
SFX Y7   hý          žší/W2Y1          [^c]hý
SFX Y7   chý         šší/W2Y1          chý
SFX Y7   ký          ší/W2Y1           ký
SFX Y7   ý           ší/W2Y1           [sz]ý

SFX Y8 Y 2
SFX Y8   ý           čí/W2Y1          [nvtdbpm]ý
SFX Y8   ký          čí/W2Y1          ký


SFX YA Y 9
SFX YA   ý           ější/N1Y1         [bdmnptv]ý
SFX YA   ý           ejší/N1Y1         lý
SFX YA   rý          řejší/N1Y1        rý
SFX YA   í           ější/N1Y1         ní
SFX YA   cký         čtější/N1Y1       cký
SFX YA   ský         štější/N1Y1       ský
SFX YA   ý           ejší/N1Y1         [sz]ý
SFX YA   hý          žejší/N1Y1        [^c]hý
SFX YA   chý         šejší/N1Y1        chý

SFX YB Y 5
SFX YB   ý           ší/N1Y1           [bdmnprstvz]ý
SFX YB   hý          žší/N1Y1          [^c]hý
SFX YB   chý         šší/N1Y1          chý
SFX YB   ký          ší/N1Y1           ký
SFX YB   ý           ší/N1Y1           [sz]ý

SFX YC Y 2
SFX YC   ý           čí/N1Y1          [nvtdbpm]ý
SFX YC   ký          čí/N1Y1          ký
