basic-cs.dic
amatérský/Y1K1R1N1Y2
antikorozní/Y1R1N1Y2
arabský/Y1R1N1Y2
badatelský/Y1K1R1Y2
bavorský/Y1R1N1
bezděčný/Y1K1R1Y2
beztrestný/Y1K1R1Y2
bledý/Y1K1R1Y3
bleskový/Y1R1N1Y2
bohatý/Y1K1R1N1Y3Y2
bohatý/Y1K1R1N1Y3Y2
bolševický/Y1R1N1Y2
božský/Y1K1R1N1Y2
běhat/J1T1N1
břitký/Y1K1R1Y4
celistvý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
chladný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
chudý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
chutný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
chápavý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
danajský/Y1K1R1Y2
defektní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
devadesátiletý/F1Y1R1
devadesátka/Z1Q1F1
diabetický/Y1R1N1Y2
distribuční/Y1R1N1
dlouhý/Y1R1O1N1Y5
dobrovolný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dobrý/Y1R1N1Y5
doladit/A1T1N1
dolejší/Y1R1E1
domýšlivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
doskočit/A1N1
dožitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
drahý/Y1R1O1Y3
drcený/Y1K1R1N1
dunivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dvacetiletý/F1Y1R1
dvacetičlenný/Y1K1R1F1
dvacítka/Z1Q1F1
dál/E1
dřímat/A1J1N1
důkladný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
eliptický/Y1R1N1Y2
eventuální/Y1K1R1Y2
explozivní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
farmaceutický/Y1R1N1Y2
fundamentální/Y1K1R1Y2
garantovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
gymnaziální/Y1R1Y2
hebký/Y1K1R1N1Y4
hezký/Y1K1N1Y4
hladký/Y1K1R1N1Y3
hlesnout/A1N1
hloubkový/Y1K1R1Y2
hluchý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
hnědý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
horečný/Y1R1N1Y2
hotovostní/Y1R1N1
hořejší/Y1R1E1
hrobový/Y1R1N1Y2
hrubý/Y1K1R1N1Y3Y2
hrubý/Y1K1R1N1Y3Y2
hustý/Y1R1O1N1Y3Y2
hypertextový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hřmět/A1N1
improvizovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
interpretovaný/Y1K1R1N1
invenční/Y1K1R1N1Y2
jednoduchý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
jednoduchý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
jednotný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
jiný/Y1N1Y3
jmenný/Y1K1R1N1
karcinogenní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
klaunský/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kolaborantský/Y1R1N1Y2
komplikovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kondenzovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
koordinovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kopnout/A1T1N1
kritický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
krotký/Y1K1R1N1Y3
krytí/S1N1
krátký/Y1K1R1O1N1Y5
krátký/Y1K1R1O1N1Y5
kusový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
křehký/Y1K1R1N1Y4
křehký/Y1K1R1N1Y4
křivolaký/Y1K1R1N1
laskavý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
lehký/Y1K1R1O1N1Y4
lehký/Y1K1R1O1N1Y4
liberalizovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
lichtenštejnský/Y1R1N1
lichý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
lukrativní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
lískový/Y1R1N1
maligní/Y1K1R1Y2
malý/Y1K1R1N1Y5
malý/Y1K1R1N1Y5
mechanický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
metrický/Y1C1R1N1
metrový/Y1K1R1F2
mladistvý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
mladý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
mladý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
monografický/Y1R1K1Y2
motat/J1T1N1
muzikálový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
měděný/Y1R1N1Y2
měkký/Y1K1R1O1N1Y4
měkký/Y1K1R1O1N1Y4
mělký/Y1K1R1O1N1Y4
nabitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nafoukaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nahlížet/J1T1N1
napadaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nastolený/Y1K1R1N1
navyklý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
načervenalý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nesený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
norman/P1D1E1XD
novátorský/Y1R1N1Y2
náramný/Y1K1R1Y2
náruživý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nízký/Y1K1R1O1Y5
nízký/Y1K1R1O1Y5
níže/E1
obdařený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
obklíčení/S1N1
oblý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
obtížný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
obyčejný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
odbytový/Y1R1N1Y2
oddat/J1T1N1
odložení/S1N1
odmítaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
odstavený/Y1K1R1N1
odvolaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ohavný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
okamžitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
omluvený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
opatrný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
optimalizovat/A1T1N1
opřený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
osmdesátiletý/F1Y1R1
osmdesátka/Z1Q1F1
ostrý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
osvobozenecký/Y1R1N1
otřesný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ozbrojování/S1N1
ožehavý/Y1K1R1Y2
padesátiletý/F1Y1R1
padesátka/Z1Q1F1
padesátník/P1I1F1XD
paralelní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pastýřský/Y1R1N1Y2
pevný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
plachý/Y1K1R1Y3
plachý/Y1K1R1Y3
plazit/A1N1
plnoprávný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
plochý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
pochybený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
podbízivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
podprůměrný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
podráždění/S1N1
pohostinný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pojistit/A1C1N1
pokrytý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
polykání/S1N1
ponechaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
poraněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
poskytnutý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
postřehnout/A1T1N1
potulný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
považovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pověrčivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
početní/Y1R1N1Y2
pošetilý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
prašivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
premonstrátský/Y1K1R1N1
produktivní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
projednat/J1T1N1
prolezlý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
proplatit/A1C1N1
prorůstový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
prostý/Y1K1R1N1Y3Y2
protispolečenský/Y1K1R1Y2
protékat/J1T1N1
prozřetelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
prudký/Y1K1R1N1Y3
prudký/Y1K1R1N1Y3
průtokový/Y1R1N1
průzračný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pustý/Y1R1N1Y3Y2
předcházející/Y1N1
předepsaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
předvčerejší/Y1R1E1
přehnout/J1T1N1
přejatý/Y1N1Y2
přepadnout/A1N1
přetažený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
převažovat/A1T1N1
přihlížející/Y1N1
přisadit/A1C1N1
přílišný/Y1K1R1N1
přímočarý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
redukovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
regulovatelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rodový/Y1R1N1Y2
rozebraný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozhodit/A1C1N1
roznést/A1T1N1
rozpustný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozvrhnout/A1C1N1
rudý/Y1K1R1N1Y3Y2
sadový/Y1R1Y2
sanitní/Y1R1N1
sedmdesátiletý/F1Y1R1
sedmdesátka/Z1Q1F1
sepnout/J1T1N1
severoamerický/Y1R1N1Y2
shýbnout/A1N1
slabý/Y1K1R1O1Y3Y2
slabý/Y1K1R1O1Y3Y2
sladit/A1C1N1T1
sladký/Y1K1R1O1N1Y3
sladký/Y1K1R1O1N1Y3
slavnostní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
smyšlený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
snášenlivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
snědý/Y1K1R1N1Y3Y2
soustředění/S1N1
splnitelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
spolupodílet/A1J1N1
sprostý/Y1R1N1Y3Y2
stahování/S1N1
starozákonní/Y1R1N1Y2
starý/Y1K1R1Y3
starý/Y1K1R1Y3
strukturní/Y1K1R1N1
stínový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
subvencovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
suchý/Y1K1R1O1Y3
sympatický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
synchronizovat/A1T1N1
tenký/Y1K1R1Y4
tichý/Y1K1R1O1Y3
tichý/Y1K1R1O1Y3
tikat/J1N1
tlustý/Y1R1N1Y3Y2
tmavý/Y1K1R1Y3Y2
tragický/Y1C1R1Y2
trpký/Y1K1R1N1Y4
trpký/Y1K1R1N1Y4
trubkový/Y1K1R1N1
tuhý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
tuhý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
tvrdý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y3
tvrdý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y3
těsný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
těžký/Y1K1R1O1Y3
těžký/Y1K1R1O1Y3
třicetiletý/F1Y1R1
třicátník/P1I1F1XD
třicítka/Z1Q1F1
třídní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
uhasit/A1C1N1
umožnění/S1N1
upravený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
urgentní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ustávat/J1N1
uvězněný/Y1K1R1N1
uzavřený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vegetariánský/Y1R1N1
velký/Y1K1N1Y5
virový/Y1R1Y2
vlhký/Y1K1R1N1Y4
vlhký/Y1K1R1N1Y4
vloupat/A1J1T1N1
vratký/Y1K1R1N1Y3
vstávat/J1N1
vulkanický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
vydávání/S1N1
vyjmenovávat/J1T1N1
vylíhnout/A1T1N1
vymezený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vypnutí/S1N1
vyskočit/A1N1
vytipovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vytopený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyvádět/J1T1N1
vyříznout/A1T1N1
vzdálený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vzpírat/J1T1N1
výlučný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
výsledkový/Y1R1N1
výše/E1Z1
zabitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zabojovat/A1T1N1
zahučet/A1N1
založený/Y1K1R1N1
zamítnutý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zapeklitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zasklený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zatajený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zatvrzelý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zařezávat/J1T1N1
zdobný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zdravý/Y1K1R1N1O1Y2
zhynout/A1N1
zlikvidovat/A1T1N1
zlomyslný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zlý/Y1K1R1N1Y5
zlý/Y1K1R1N1Y5
zpomalovat/A1T1N1
způsobilý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zvěstování/S1N1
zádumčivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zítřejší/Y1R1E1
únorový/Y1R1Y2
čelit/A1T1N1
činný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
čistý/Y1R1O1N1Y3Y2
čtyřicetiletý/F1Y1R1
čtyřicátník/P1I1F1XD
čtyřicítka/Z1Q1F1
šedesátiletý/F1Y1R1
šedesátka/Z1Q1F1
šedesátník/P1I1F1XD
šedý/Y1K1R1N1Y3
širokoúhlý/Y1R1E1
širý/Y1Y3
škaredý/Y1K1R1N1Y3Y2
šovinistický/Y1R1N1Y2
štěpit/A1T1N1
žlutý/Y1K1R1N1Y3Y2
